Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

32-1-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Special District Act".

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1542, § 1, effective July 1.

32-1-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the organization of special districts providing the services and having the purposes, powers, and authority provided in this article will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, prosperity, security, and general welfare of the inhabitants of such districts and of the people of the state of Colorado.

The general assembly further declares that the procedures contained in part 2 of this article are necessary for the coordinated and orderly creation of special districts and for the logical extension of special district services throughout the state. It is the purpose of part 2 of this article to prevent unnecessary proliferation and fragmentation of local government and to avoid excessive diffusion of local tax sources.

The general assembly further declares that the purpose of part 5 of this article is to facilitate the elimination of the overlapping of services provided by local governments and the double taxation which may occur because of annexation or otherwise when all or part of the taxable property of an area lies within the boundaries of both a municipality and a special district.

The general assembly further declares that it is the policy of this state to provide for and encourage the consolidation of special districts and to provide the means therefor by simple procedures in order to prevent or reduce duplication, overlapping, and fragmentation of the functions and facilities of special districts; that such consolidation will better serve the people of this state; and that consolidated districts will result in reduced costs and increased efficiency of operation.

The general assembly further declares that the purpose of part 7 of this article is to facilitate dissolution of special districts in order to reduce the proliferation, fragmentation, and overlapping of local governments and to encourage assumption of services by other governmental entities.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1542, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Ambulance district" means a special district which provides emergency medical services and the transportation of sick, disabled, or injured persons by motor vehicle, aircraft, or other form of transportation to and from facilities providing medical services. For the purpose of this subsection (1), "emergency medical services" means services engaged in providing initial emergency medical assistance, including, but not limited to, the treatment of trauma and burns and respiratory, circulatory, and obstetrical emergencies.

(1.5) "Board" means the board of directors of a special district.

"Court" means the district court in any county in which the petition for organization of the special district was originally filed and which entered the order organizing said district or the district court to which the file pertaining to the special district has been transferred pursuant to section 32-1-303 (1)(b).

(2.5) "Depository institution" means:

A person that is organized or chartered, or is doing business or holds an authorization certificate, under the laws of a state or of the United States which authorize the person to receive deposits, including deposits in savings, shares, certificates, or other deposit accounts, and that is supervised and examined for the protection of depositors by an official or agency of a state or the United States; and

A trust company or other institution that is authorized by federal or state law to exercise fiduciary powers of the type that a national bank is permitted to exercise under the authority of the comptroller of the currency and that is supervised and examined by an official or agency of a state or the United States. The term does not include an insurance company or other organization primarily engaged in the insurance business.

"Director" means a member of the board.

"Division" means the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

(4.5) "Early childhood development service district" means a special district created pursuant to article 21 of this title 32 to provide, directly or indirectly, early childhood development services to children from birth through eight years of age.

"Eligible elector" means a person who, at the designated time or event, is registered to vote pursuant to the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S., and:

Who is a resident of the special district or the area to be included in the special district; or

Who, or whose spouse or civil union partner, owns taxable real or personal property situated within the boundaries of the special district or the area to be included in the special district, whether said person resides within the special district or not.

A person who is obligated to pay taxes under a contract to purchase taxable property situated within the boundaries of the special district or the area to be included within the special district shall be considered an owner within the meaning of this subsection (5).

Repealed.

For all elections and petitions that require ownership of real property or land, the ownership of a mobile home as defined in section 38-12-201.5 (5) or 5-1-301 (29), or a manufactured home as defined in section 42-1-102 (48.8), is sufficient to qualify as ownership of real property or land for the purpose of voting rights and petitions.

In the event that the board, by resolution, ends business personal property taxation by the district pursuant to subsection (8)(b) of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, persons owning such property and spouses or civil union partners of such persons shall not be eligible electors of the district on the basis of ownership of such property.

Repealed.

(6.5) "Financial institution or institutional investor" means any of the following, whether acting for itself or others in a fiduciary capacity:

A depository institution;

An insurance company;

A separate account of an insurance company;

An investment company registered under the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940";

A business development company as defined in the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940";

Any private business development company as defined in the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940";

An employee pension, profit-sharing, or benefit plan if the plan has total assets in excess of five million dollars or its investment decisions are made by a named fiduciary, as defined in the federal "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974", that is a broker-dealer registered under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", an investment adviser registered or exempt from registration under the federal "Investment Advisers Act of 1940", a depository institution, or an insurance company;

An entity, but not an individual, a substantial part of whose business activities consists of investing, purchasing, selling, or trading in securities of more than one issuer and not of its own issue and that has total assets in excess of five million dollars as of the end of its last fiscal year; and

A small business investment company licensed by the federal small business administration under the federal "Small Business Investment Act of 1958".

"Fire protection district" means a special district which provides protection against fire by any available means and which may supply ambulance and emergency medical and rescue services.

(7.5) "Forest improvement district" means a special district created pursuant to article 18 of this title that protects communities from wildfires and improves the condition of forests in the district.

"Governing body" means a city council or board of trustees and includes a body or board where the operation and management of service is under the control of a municipal body or board other than a city council or board of trustees.

(8.5) "Health assurance district" means a special district that is created to organize, operate, control, direct, manage, contract for, furnish, or provide, directly or indirectly, health-care services to residents of the district and family members of such residents who are in need of such services.

"Health service district" means a special district that may establish, maintain, or operate, directly or indirectly through lease to or from other parties or other arrangement, public hospitals, convalescent centers, nursing care facilities, intermediate care facilities, emergency facilities, community clinics, or other facilities licensed or certified pursuant to section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a), C.R.S., providing health and personal care services and may organize, own, operate, control, direct, manage, contract for, or furnish ambulance service.

(9.3) "Inactive special district" means a special district in a predevelopment stage that has no residents other than those who lived within the district boundaries prior to the formation of the district, no business or commercial ventures or facilities within its boundaries, has not issued any general obligation or revenue debt and does not have any financial obligations outstanding or contracts in effect that require performance by the district during the time the district is inactive, has not imposed a mill levy for tax collection in that fiscal year, anticipates no receipt of revenue and has no planned expenditures, except for statutory compliance, in that fiscal year, has no operation or maintenance responsibility for any facilities, has initially filed a notice of inactive status pursuant to section 32-1-104 (3), and, each year thereafter, has filed a notice of continuing inactive status pursuant to section 32-1-104 (4).

(9.5) "Mental health-care service district" means a special district created pursuant to this article to provide, directly or indirectly, mental health-care services to residents of the district who are in need of mental health-care services and to family members of such residents.

"Metropolitan district" means a special district that provides for the inhabitants thereof any two or more of the following services:

Fire protection;

Mosquito control;

Parks and recreation;

Safety protection;

Sanitation;

Solid waste disposal facilities or collection and transportation of solid waste;

Street improvement;

Television relay and translation;

Transportation;

Water.

"Municipality" means a municipality as defined in section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S.

"Net effective interest rate" means the net interest cost of securities issued by a public body divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amount of the securities maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from their date to their respective maturities. In all cases, net effective interest rate shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the securities.

"Net interest cost" means the total amount of interest to accrue on securities issued by a public body from their date to their respective maturities, less the amount of any premium above par, or plus the amount of any discount below par, at which said securities are being or have been sold. In all cases net interest cost shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the securities.

"Park and recreation district" means a special district which provides parks or recreational facilities or programs within said district.

(14.5) "Property owners list" means the list furnished by the county assessor in accordance with section 1-5-304, 1-13.5-204, or 1-13.5-1105 (2)(a) and (2)(b) showing each property owner within the district, as shown on a deed or contract of record.

"Publication" means printing one time, in one newspaper of general circulation in the special district or proposed special district if there is such a newspaper, and, if not, then in a newspaper in the county in which the special district or proposed special district is located. For a special district with territory within more than one county, if publication cannot be made in one newspaper of general circulation in the special district, then one publication is required in a newspaper in each county in which the special district is located and in which the special district also has fifty or more eligible electors.

"Quorum" means more than one-half of the number of directors serving on the board of a special district.

"Regular special district election" means the election on the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday of May in every odd-numbered year, held for the purpose of electing members to the boards of special districts and for submission of other public questions, if any.

(17.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 874, § 105, effective January 1, 1993.)

"Sanitation district" means a special district that provides for storm or sanitary sewers, or both, flood and surface drainage, treatment and disposal works and facilities, or solid waste disposal facilities or waste services, and all necessary or proper equipment and appurtenances incident thereto.

"Secretary" means the secretary of the board.

(19.5) "Solid waste" shall have the same definition as specified in section 30-20-101 (6), C.R.S.

"Special district" means any quasi-municipal corporation and political subdivision organized or acting pursuant to the provisions of this article. "Special district" does not include any entity organized or acting pursuant to the provisions of article 8 of title 29, article 20 of title 30, article 25 of title 31, or articles 41 to 50 of title 37, C.R.S.

"Special election" means any election called by the board for submission of public questions and other matters. The election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in February, May, October, or December, in November of even-numbered years or on the first Tuesday in November of odd-numbered years. Any special district may petition a district court judge who has jurisdiction in such district for permission to hold a special election on a day other than those specified in this subsection (21). The district court judge may grant permission only upon a finding that an election on the days specified would be impossible or impracticable or upon a finding that an unforeseeable emergency would require an election on a day other than those specified.

"Taxable property" means real or personal property subject to general ad valorem taxes. "Taxable property" does not include the ownership of property on which a specific ownership tax is paid pursuant to law.

"Taxpaying elector" means an eligible elector of a special district who, or whose spouse or civil union partner, owns taxable real or personal property within the special district or the area to be included in or excluded from the special district, whether the person resides within the special district or not.

A person who is obligated to pay taxes under a contract to purchase taxable property within the special district shall be considered an owner within the meaning of this subsection (23).

For all elections and petitions that require ownership of real property or land, the ownership of a mobile home as defined in section 38-12-201.5 (5) or 5-1-301 (29), or a manufactured home as defined in section 42-1-102 (48.8), is sufficient to qualify as ownership of real property or land for the purpose of voting rights and petitions.

(23.2) "Tunnel" means one or more holes under or through the ground, mountains, rock formations, or other natural or man-made material, including roads, railroads, pipelines, and other means of transporting vehicles, people, or goods through any such tunnel, whether located in the tunnel or, to the extent the same connects the tunnel to other similar facilities, located outside the tunnel. "Tunnel" also means any ventilation, drainage, and support facilities, toll collection facilities, administrative facilities, and other facilities necessary or convenient to the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipping, operation, or maintenance of the tunnel or to the operation of the tunnel district, whether located within or without the tunnel.

(23.5) "Tunnel district" means a special district which provides a tunnel.

"Water and sanitation district" means a special district which provides both water district and sanitation district services.

"Water district" means a special district which supplies water for domestic and other public and private purposes by any available means and provides all necessary or proper reservoirs, treatment works and facilities, equipment, and appurtenances incident thereto.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1543, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(5)(d) and (23)(c) added, p. 546, §§ 5, 6, effective April 15.

L. 83:

(1) R&RE and (1.5) added, p. 412, §§ 2, 3, effective June 1.

L. 85:

(20) amended, p. 1097, § 1, effective April 30; (21) amended, p. 1027, § 4, effective July 1; IP(5)(a) and (5)(a)(I) amended and (14.5) and (17.5) added, p. 1083, § 1, effective July 1, 1986.

L. 86:

(5)(c) repealed and (21) amended, pp. 1068, 814, §§ 3, 6, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(23.2) and (23.5) added, p. 1232, § 1, effective May 13; IP(5)(a), (5)(a)(I), (5)(b), and (14.5) amended, p. 333, § 100, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(6) repealed, p. 1135, § 85, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(5)(d) amended, p. 1848, § 46, effective May 31.

L. 91:

(2.5) and (6.5) added, p. 780, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 92:

IP(5)(a), (17), (17.5), (21), and (23)(a) amended, p. 874, § 105, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(5)(a)(I) and (21) amended, p. 1438, § 133, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(5)(d) and (23)(c) amended, p. 706, § 10, effective April 19; (14.5) and (15) amended, p. 1194, § 97, effective July 1; (5)(a)(I) amended, p. 1775, § 45, effective January 1, 1995; (5)(d) and (23)(c) amended, p. 2565, § 79, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(5)(e) added and (9) and (14.5) amended, pp. 1771, 470, §§ 72, 1, 73, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(10) and (18) amended and (19.5) added, p. 1069, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(5)(d) and (23)(c) amended, p. 1276, § 42, effective June 5.

L. 2003:

(9) amended, p. 715, § 58, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(9.5) added, p. 1035, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2007:

(7.5) added, p. 425, § 1, effective April 9; (8.5) added, p. 1186, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(20) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1979, § 109, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(9.3) added, (HB 10-1362), ch. 360, p. 1710, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2014:

(5)(a), (5)(e), and (23)(a) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 70, § 29, effective February 18.

L. 2018:

IP and (17) amended, (HB 18-1039), ch. 29, p. 330, § 3, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2019:

IP amended and (4.5) added, (HB 19-1052), ch. 72, p. 257, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(5)(d) and (23)(c) amended, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 927, § 18, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(14.5) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 538, § 6, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(5)(d) and (23)(c) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2982, § 73, effective August 10.

32-1-104. Establishment of a special districts file.

The division shall promptly establish and maintain on a current basis, as a public record, a file listing by name all special districts, listing the names and addresses of all the members of the boards of the special districts, and recording all changes in the names or boundaries of the special districts. The file shall also list the names of the officers of each special district and a business address, a telephone number, and the name of a contact person for each district. Annually, the division shall compile and maintain a current and revised list of special districts for public inspection. Each special district shall register its business address, its telephone number, and the name of a contact person with the division when certifying the results of a district election pursuant to section 1-11-103 or 1-13.5-1305 (1).

On or before January 15 of each year, a special district shall file a copy of the notice required pursuant section 32-1-809 (1) with the board of county commissioners, the county assessor, the county treasurer, and the county clerk and recorder of each county in which the special district is located, the governing body of any municipality in which the special district is located, and the division.

The board of directors of an inactive special district may adopt a resolution that describes and affirms its qualifications for its inactive status and may direct that a notice of inactive status be filed with the board of county commissioners and the city council of each county and city that approved its service plan pursuant to section 32-1-204 or 32-1-204.5; the treasurer, assessor, and the clerk and recorder of the county or counties in which the inactive special district is located; the district court having jurisdiction over the formation of the special district; the state auditor; and the division of local government. The notice of inactive status shall be filed on or before December 15 of the year in which the board adopts a resolution of inactive status. At the time of filing the notice of inactive status, the district shall be in compliance with each of the requirements specified in subsection (5) of this section.

When the board of directors of a district on inactive status determines that the district shall return to active status, the board shall adopt a resolution that declares the district's return to active status and authorizes the filing of a notice of the district's determination to return to active status with the same such entities that received the notice of inactive status under paragraph (a) of this subsection (3). The district's board of directors shall cause the district to be brought into compliance for the remainder of the fiscal year in which the district returns to active status with all legal requirements specified in this section for which the district has otherwise been exempt while on inactive status. The district shall be in compliance with such requirements within ninety days of delivery of notice of the board's determination to return to active status pursuant to this paragraph (b). The notices delivered pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be by certified mail, return receipt requested, except where electronic filing is required by the receiving entity.

The notice of inactive status, notice of continuing inactive status, and notice of return to active status shall be standard forms developed by the division and shall be made available on the division's website.

A special district shall not return to active status until it has filed an information statement under section 32-1-104.8.

The special district shall be on inactive status during the period commencing with the filing of its notice of inactive status pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section until such time as it has issued a notice of its determination to return to active status pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section. During the period that a district is on inactive status, it shall not issue any debt, impose a mill levy, or conduct any other official business other than to conduct elections and to undertake procedures necessary to implement the district's intention to return to active status. Inactive special districts shall file with the state auditor and the division on or before December 15 of each year in which the district is on inactive status a notice that it is continuing in such status for the next fiscal year.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, inactive special districts are exempt from compliance with subsection (2) of this section; sections 32-1-104.5 (3), 32-1-207 (3)(c), 32-1-306, 32-1-809, and 32-1-903; parts 1, 2, and 6 of article 1 of title 29; and part 1 of article 1 and part 1 of article 5 of title 39.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1545, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1020, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 875, § 106, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1790, § 77, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1194, § 98, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(3), (4), and (5) added, (HB 10-1362), ch. 360, p. 1710, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(3)(d) added, (HB 13-1186), ch. 102, p. 325, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2015:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 15-1092), ch. 87, p. 250, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 538, § 7, effective September 7; (5) amended, (SB 21-262), ch. 368, p. 2427, § 2, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-103 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-104.5. Audit and budget requirements - election results - description on state websites.

The division shall post on its official website in a form that is readily accessible to the public:

A general description in plain, nontechnical language of the requirements for a special district to have an annual audit of the district's financial statements prepared in accordance with the "Colorado Local Government Audit Law", part 6 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., and information about where a copy of the audit report is available for public inspection;

A general description in plain, nontechnical language of the process and requirements for a special district to adopt an annual budget in accordance with the "Local Government Budget Law of Colorado", part 1 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., and information about where a copy of the budget is available for public inspection; and

The election results certified to the division pursuant to section 1-11-103 (3), C.R.S.

The secretary of state shall provide a link to the election results posted by the division pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section on the official website of the department of state.

Except as provided in subsection (3)(d) of this section, within one year of the date an order and decree has been issued by a district court for a newly organized metropolitan district, or by January 1, 2023, for any metropolitan district that has received an order and decree from the district court in connection with its organization after January 1, 2000, but before January 1, 2022, the metropolitan district shall establish, maintain, and, unless otherwise specified, annually update an official website in a form that is readily accessible to the public that contains the following information:

The names, terms, and contact information for the current directors of the board of the metropolitan district and of the manager of the metropolitan district, if applicable;

The current fiscal year budget of the metropolitan district and, within thirty days of adoption by the board of the metropolitan district, any amendments to the budget;

The prior year's audited financial statements of the metropolitan district, if applicable, or an application for exemption from an audit prepared in accordance with the "Colorado Local Government Audit Law", part 6 of article 1 of title 29, within thirty days of the filing of the application with the state auditor;

The annual report of the metropolitan district in accordance with section 32-1-207 (3)(c);

By January 30 of each year, the date, time, and location of scheduled regular meetings of the district's board for the current fiscal year;

If required by section 1-13.5-501 (1.5), by no later than seventy-five days prior to a regular election for an election at which members of a board of directors for a metropolitan district will be considered, the call for nominations pursuant to section 1-13.5-501 (1);

Not more than thirty days after an election, certified election results for an election conducted within the current fiscal year;

A current map depicting the boundaries of the metropolitan district as of January 1 of the current fiscal year; and

Any other information deemed appropriate by the board of directors of the metropolitan district.

Metropolitan districts serving the same community may establish and maintain a consolidated website provided the website clearly identifies each metropolitan district and provides the required information specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section for each metropolitan district.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a notice of meeting containing the information set forth in section 24-6-402 (2)(c)(III) and posted on the metropolitan district's website no less than twenty-four hours prior to such meeting satisfies the requirements of section 24-6-402 (2)(c)(III).

Any metropolitan district in inactive status pursuant to section 32-1-104 (3) is not required to establish, maintain, or update an official website during inactive status. A metropolitan district returning to active status shall comply with this subsection (3) within ninety days of adoption of a resolution returning to active status.

Any metropolitan district that does not have the power to impose an ad valorem property tax is not required to establish, maintain, or update an official website pursuant to this subsection (3).

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-087), ch. 325, p. 1731, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2015:

(2) amended and (1)(c) added, (HB 15-1092), ch. 87, p. 251, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

(3) added, (SB 21-262), ch. 368, p. 2427, § 3, effective September 7.

32-1-104.8. Information statement regarding taxes and debt.

Every special district shall record a special district public disclosure document and a map of the boundaries of the district with the county clerk and recorder of each county in which the district is located that provides the following information:

The name of the district;

The powers of the district as authorized by section 32-1-1004 and the district's service plan or, as appropriate, the district's statement of purpose as described in section 32-1-208, current as of the time of the filing;

A statement indicating that the district's service plan or, as appropriate, the district's statement of purpose as described in section 32-1-208, which can be amended from time to time, includes a description of the district's powers and authority, and that a copy of the service plan or statement of purpose is available from the division; and

The following statement:

Special districts existing as of August 7, 2013, shall record the special district public disclosure document required by subsection (1) of this section on or before December 31, 2014. The disclosure document for any district organized after August 7, 2013, or for any inclusion of additional real property within an existing district, shall be recorded at the same time the decree or order confirming the action is recorded as required by section 32-1-105. The requirement to record the disclosure document may be enforced by the board of county commissioners or the governing body of any municipality that has approved the service plan of the district in the same manner as the enforcement of information reporting requirements under section 32-1-209. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, failure to record a disclosure document does not invalidate the organization of, or change the boundaries of, a district or provide a cause of action against the district or any other person, nor does it invalidate or reduce any debt issued at any time by the district, nor does it reduce for any property the mill levy or its responsibility for the proportionate share of the district's outstanding debt.

This section does not apply to any special district while it is on inactive status under section 32-1-104 (4).

Nothing contained in the special district public disclosure document required by this section constitutes the basis for a title defect or creation of an unmarketable title.

Recording a special district public disclosure document and map is subject to the fee payment requirements set forth in section 30-1-103 (1), C.R.S.

[Name of the district] is authorized by title 32 of the Colorado Revised Statutes to use a number of methods to raise revenues for capital needs and general operations costs. These methods, subject to the limitations imposed by section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, include issuing debt, levying taxes, and imposing fees and charges. Information concerning directors, management, meetings, elections, and current taxes are provided annually in the Notice to Electors described in section 32-1-809 (1), Colorado Revised Statutes, which can be found at the district office, on the district's website, on file at the division of local government in the state department of local affairs, or on file at the office of the clerk and recorder of each county in which the special district is located.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1186), ch. 102, p. 324, § 2, effective August 7.

32-1-105. Notice of organization, dissolution, name change, or boundary change.

No organization, dissolution, or change in the name or boundaries of any special district shall be effective until the decree or order confirming such action, together with a description of the area concerned, is recorded by the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the organization, dissolution, or change in the name or boundaries took place. The county clerk and recorder shall notify the county assessor of any such action. A certified copy of such notice shall also be filed with the division by the county clerk and recorder.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1546, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1092), ch. 87, p. 251, § 4, effective August 5.

32-1-106. Repetitioning of elections - time limits.

If, after any election for the organization or dissolution of any special district or for the inclusion of territory into a special district pursuant to section 32-1-401 (2) or for the exclusion of property within a municipality from a special district pursuant to section 32-1-502, it appears that the proposal was defeated, no new petition for the organization or dissolution, as the case may be, of such a special district embracing the same or substantially the same area and no new petition for inclusion or exclusion, as the case may be, of territory pursuant to sections 32-1-401 (2) and 32-1-502 shall be submitted again until the expiration of eight months after the date of the election at which the proposal was defeated.

If, after any election submitting to the electors of any special district the proposition of creating any indebtedness of the special district, it appears that the proposition was defeated, no new proposition for creating such indebtedness of the special district shall be submitted until the expiration of five months after the date of the election at which the proposal was defeated.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1546, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1195, § 99, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-105 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-107. Service area of special districts.

A special district may be entirely within or entirely without, or partly within and partly without, one or more municipalities or counties, and a special district may consist of noncontiguous tracts or parcels of property.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no special district may be organized wholly or partly within an existing special district providing the same service. Nothing in this subsection (2) shall prevent a special district providing different services from organizing wholly or partly within an existing special district. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a metropolitan district may be organized wholly or partly within an existing special district, but a metropolitan district shall not provide the same service as the existing special district.

For purposes of this subsection (3), "overlapping special district" means a new or existing special or metropolitan district located wholly or partly within an existing special or metropolitan district.

An overlapping special district may be authorized to provide the same service as the existing special or metropolitan district that the overlapping special district overlaps or will overlap if:

Where the service plan of such overlapping special district is subject to approval by the board of county commissioners, the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which the overlapping territory is located approves by resolution the inclusion of such service as part of the service plan of said overlapping special district; and

Where the service plan of such overlapping special district is subject to the approval of the governing body of a municipality, the governing body of any municipality that has adopted a resolution of approval of the overlapping special district pursuant to section 32-1-204.5 (1)(a) or 32-1-204.7 approves by resolution the inclusion of such service as part of the service plan of said overlapping special district; and

The improvements or facilities to be financed, established, or operated by the overlapping special district for the provision of the same service as the existing special or metropolitan district do not duplicate or interfere with any other improvements or facilities already constructed or planned to be constructed within the portion of the existing special or metropolitan district that the overlapping special district overlaps or will overlap; and

The board of directors of any special district or metropolitan district authorized to provide a service within the boundaries of the overlapping area consents to the overlapping special district providing the same service.

Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to encourage the unnecessary proliferation, duplication, overlapping, or fragmentation of special or metropolitan districts.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1546, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 1415, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2003:

(3)(b)(II) amended, p. 1315, § 1, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-3-103 (1) and (2) as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-108. Correction of faulty notices.

In any case where a notice is provided for in this article, if the court finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the court shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and the proceeding in question shall not thereby be void or be abated; but the court, in that case, shall order due notice to be given and shall continue the hearing until such time as notice has been properly given, and thereupon it shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in the first instance.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1546, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.